Illinois, session 104th, SB234.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 5changing Sections 12-3.4, 12-3.8, and 12-3.9 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/12-3.4)  (was 720 ILCS 5/12-30)7    Sec. 12-3.4. Violation of an order of protection. 8    (a) A person commits violation of an order of protection 9if:10        (1) He or she knowingly commits an act which was 11    prohibited by a court or fails to commit an act which was 12    ordered by a court in violation of:13            (i) a remedy in a valid order of protection 14        authorized under paragraphs (1), (2), (3), (14), or 15        (14.5) of subsection (b) of Section 214 of the 16        Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986,17            (ii) a remedy, which is substantially similar to 18        the remedies authorized under paragraphs (1), (2), 19        (3), (14) or (14.5) of subsection (b) of Section 214 of 20        the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986, in a valid 21        order of protection, which is authorized under the 22        laws of another state, tribe or United States 23        territory,  SB0234- 2 -LRB104 03938 RLC 13962 b1            (iii) any other remedy when the act constitutes a 2        crime against the protected parties as the term 3        protected parties is defined in Section 112A-4 of the 4        Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963; and5        (2) Such violation occurs after the offender has been 6    served notice of the contents of the order, pursuant to 7    the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986 or any 8    substantially similar statute of another state, tribe or 9    United States territory, or otherwise has acquired actual 10    knowledge of the contents of the order.11    An order of protection issued by a state, tribal or 12territorial court related to domestic or family violence shall 13be deemed valid if the issuing court had jurisdiction over the 14parties and matter under the law of the state, tribe or 15territory. There shall be a presumption of validity where an 16order is certified and appears authentic on its face. For 17purposes of this Section, an "order of protection" may have 18been issued in a criminal or civil proceeding. 19    (a-5) Failure to provide reasonable notice and opportunity 20to be heard shall be an affirmative defense to any charge or 21process filed seeking enforcement of a foreign order of 22protection.23    (b) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to diminish 24the inherent authority of the courts to enforce their lawful 25orders through civil or criminal contempt proceedings.26    (c) The limitations placed on law enforcement liability by   SB0234- 3 -LRB104 03938 RLC 13962 b1Section 305 of the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986 2apply to actions taken under this Section.3    (d) Violation of an order of protection is a Class A 4misdemeanor. Violation of an order of protection is a Class 4 5felony if the defendant has any prior conviction under this 6Code for domestic battery (Section 12-3.2), or violation of an 7order of protection (Section 12-3.4 or 12-30), violation of a 8civil no contact order (Section 12-3.8), violation of a 9stalking no contact order (Section 12-3.9), or any prior 10conviction under the law of another jurisdiction for an 11offense that could be charged in this State as a domestic 12battery or violation of an order of protection, violation of a 13civil no contact order, or violation of a stalking no contact 14order. Violation of an order of protection is a Class 4 felony 15if the defendant has any prior conviction under this Code for 16first degree murder (Section 9-1), attempt to commit first 17degree murder (Section 8-4), aggravated domestic battery 18(Section 12-3.3), aggravated battery (Section 12-3.05 or 1912-4), heinous battery (Section 12-4.1), aggravated battery 20with a firearm (Section 12-4.2), aggravated battery with a 21machine gun or a firearm equipped with a silencer (Section 2212-4.2-5), aggravated battery of a child (Section 12-4.3), 23aggravated battery of an unborn child (subsection (a-5) of 24Section 12-3.1, or Section 12-4.4), aggravated battery of a 25senior citizen (Section 12-4.6), stalking (Section 12-7.3), 26aggravated stalking (Section 12-7.4), criminal sexual assault   SB0234- 4 -LRB104 03938 RLC 13962 b1(Section 11-1.20 or 12-13), aggravated criminal sexual assault 2(Section 11-1.30 or 12-14), kidnapping (Section 10-1), 3aggravated kidnapping (Section 10-2), predatory criminal 4sexual assault of a child (Section 11-1.40 or 12-14.1), 5aggravated criminal sexual abuse (Section 11-1.60 or 12-16), 6unlawful restraint (Section 10-3), aggravated unlawful 7restraint (Section 10-3.1), aggravated arson (Section 20-1.1), 8aggravated discharge of a firearm (Section 24-1.2), or a 9violation of any former law of this State that is 10substantially similar to any listed offense, or any prior 11conviction under the law of another jurisdiction for an 12offense that could be charged in this State as one of the 13offenses listed in this Section, when any of these offenses 14have been committed against a family or household member as 15defined in Section 112A-3 of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 161963. The court shall impose a minimum penalty of 24 hours 17imprisonment for defendant's second or subsequent violation of 18any order of protection; unless the court explicitly finds 19that an increased penalty or such period of imprisonment would 20be manifestly unjust. In addition to any other penalties, the 21court may order the defendant to pay a fine as authorized under 22Section 5-9-1 of the Unified Code of Corrections or to make 23restitution to the victim under Section 5-5-6 of the Unified 24Code of Corrections.25    (e) (Blank).26    (f) A defendant who directed the actions of a third party   SB0234- 5 -LRB104 03938 RLC 13962 b1to violate this Section, under the principles of 2accountability set forth in Article 5 of this Code, is guilty 3of violating this Section as if the same had been personally 4done by the defendant, without regard to the mental state of 5the third party acting at the direction of the defendant.6(Source: P.A. 100-987, eff. 7-1-19.) 7    (720 ILCS 5/12-3.8)8    Sec. 12-3.8. Violation of a civil no contact order.9    (a) A person commits violation of a civil no contact order 10if:11        (1) he or she knowingly commits an act which was 12    prohibited by a court or fails to commit an act which was 13    ordered in violation of: 14            (A) a remedy of a valid civil no contact order 15        authorized under Section 213 of the Civil No Contact 16        Order Act or Section 112A-14.5 of the Code of Criminal 17        Procedure of 1963; or 18            (B) a remedy, which is substantially similar to 19        the remedies authorized under Section 213 of the Civil 20        No Contact Order Act or Section 112A-14.5 of the Code 21        of Criminal Procedure of 1963, or in a valid civil no 22        contact order, which is authorized under the laws of 23        another state, tribe, or United States territory; and 24        (2) the violation occurs after the offender has been 25    served notice of the contents of the order under the Civil   SB0234- 6 -LRB104 03938 RLC 13962 b1    No Contact Order Act, Article 112A of the Code of Criminal 2    Procedure of 1963, or any substantially similar statute of 3    another state, tribe, or United States territory, or 4    otherwise has acquired actual knowledge of the contents of 5    the order.6    A civil no contact order issued by a state, tribal, or 7territorial court shall be deemed valid if the issuing court 8had jurisdiction over the parties and matter under the law of 9the state, tribe, or territory. There shall be a presumption 10of validity when an order is certified and appears authentic 11on its face.12    (a-3) For purposes of this Section, a "civil no contact 13order" may have been issued in a criminal or civil proceeding.14    (a-5) Failure to provide reasonable notice and opportunity 15to be heard shall be an affirmative defense to any charge or 16process filed seeking enforcement of a foreign civil no 17contact order. 18    (b) Prosecution for a violation of a civil no contact 19order shall not bar a concurrent prosecution for any other 20crime, including any crime that may have been committed at the 21time of the violation of the civil no contact order. 22    (c) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to diminish 23the inherent authority of the courts to enforce their lawful 24orders through civil or criminal contempt proceedings.25    (d) A defendant who directed the actions of a third party 26to violate this Section, under the principles of   SB0234- 7 -LRB104 03938 RLC 13962 b1accountability set forth in Article 5 of this Code, is guilty 2of violating this Section as if the same had been personally 3done by the defendant, without regard to the mental state of 4the third party acting at the direction of the defendant. 5    (e) Sentence. A violation of a civil no contact order is a 6Class A misdemeanor. Violation of a civil no contact order is a 7Class 4 felony if the defendant has any prior conviction under 8this Code for a violation of an order of protection, violation 9of a civil no contact order, or violation of a stalking no 10contact order, (Section 12-3.4, 12-3.8, 12-3.9, or 12-30), or 11any prior conviction under the law of another jurisdiction for 12an offense that could be charged in this State as a violation 13of an order of protection, violation of a civil no contact 14order, or violation of a stalking no contact order for a first 15violation, and a Class 4 felony for a second or subsequent 16violation. 17(Source: P.A. 100-199, eff. 1-1-18.) 18    (720 ILCS 5/12-3.9)19    Sec. 12-3.9. Violation of a stalking no contact order.20    (a) A person commits violation of a stalking no contact 21order if:22        (1) he or she knowingly commits an act which was 23    prohibited by a court or fails to commit an act which was 24    ordered by a court in violation of: 25            (A) a remedy in a valid stalking no contact order   SB0234- 8 -LRB104 03938 RLC 13962 b1        of protection authorized under Section 80 of the 2        Stalking No Contact Order Act or Section 112A-14.7 of 3        the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963; or 4            (B) a remedy, which is substantially similar to 5        the remedies authorized under Section 80 of the 6        Stalking No Contact Order Act or Section 112A-14.7 of 7        the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963, or in a valid 8        stalking no contact order, which is authorized under 9        the laws of another state, tribe, or United States 10        territory; and 11        (2) the violation occurs after the offender has been 12    served notice of the contents of the order, under the 13    Stalking No Contact Order Act, Article 112A of the Code of 14    Criminal Procedure of 1963, or any substantially similar 15    statute of another state, tribe, or United States 16    territory, or otherwise has acquired actual knowledge of 17    the contents of the order.18    A stalking no contact order issued by a state, tribal, or 19territorial court shall be deemed valid if the issuing court 20had jurisdiction over the parties and matter under the law of 21the state, tribe, or territory. There shall be a presumption 22of validity when an order is certified and appears authentic 23on its face.24    (a-3) For purposes of this Section, a "stalking no contact 25order" may have been issued in a criminal or civil proceeding.26    (a-5) Failure to provide reasonable notice and opportunity   SB0234- 9 -LRB104 03938 RLC 13962 b1to be heard shall be an affirmative defense to any charge or 2process filed seeking enforcement of a foreign stalking no 3contact order. 4    (b) Prosecution for a violation of a stalking no contact 5order shall not bar a concurrent prosecution for any other 6crime, including any crime that may have been committed at the 7time of the violation of the civil no contact order. 8    (c) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to diminish 9the inherent authority of the courts to enforce their lawful 10orders through civil or criminal contempt proceedings.11    (d) A defendant who directed the actions of a third party 12to violate this Section, under the principles of 13accountability set forth in Article 5 of this Code, is guilty 14of violating this Section as if the same had been personally 15done by the defendant, without regard to the mental state of 16the third party acting at the direction of the defendant. 17    (e) Sentence. A violation of a stalking no contact order 18is a Class A misdemeanor. Violation of a stalking no contact is 19a Class 4 felony if the defendant has any prior conviction 20under this Code for a violation of an order of protection, 21violation of a stalking no contact order, or violation of a 22civil no contact order (Section 12-3.4, 12-3.8, 12-3.9, or 2312-30), or any prior conviction under the law of another 24jurisdiction for an offense that could be charged in this 25State as a violation of an order of protection, violation of a 26civil no contact order, or violation of a stalking no contact   SB0234- 10 -LRB104 03938 RLC 13962 b1order for a first violation, and a Class 4 felony for a second 2or subsequent violation. 3(Source: P.A. 100-199, eff. 1-1-18.)